Maryland, session 2025, HB1061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–203.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affordable housing” means residential property that is rented or sold
to the public as low–income housing or workforce housing.
(3) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of this
article.
(4) “Low–income housing” means housing that is affordable for a household
with an aggregate annual income that is below 60% of the area median income.
(5) “Workforce housing” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of this article.
(b) (1) (i) Not later than 60 days after the notice provided under § 5–310(d)
of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the Department shall, in consultation with
the unit of State government that controls the property, determine if the property is
suitable for use or redevelopment as affordable housing.
(ii) The Department may not identify a property as suitable for use
or redevelopment as affordable housing if the property:
1. is located outside an area designated as a priority funding
area under Title 5, Subtitle 7B of the State Finance and Procurement Article; or
2. belongs in a category of property listed in § 5–310(c)(1)(i)
of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(iii) When determining if a property is suitable for use or
redevelopment as affordable housing, the Department shall consider whether the property:
1. is adequately sized for any type of residential use;
2. has access to public utilities;

HOUSE BILL 1061 3
3. has access to feasible ingress and egress points; and
4. meets any other factors determined by the Department
that are necessary for the property to be used or redeveloped as affordable housing.
(2) The Department shall compile and regularly update a list of properties
it has determined are suitable for use or redevelopment as affordable housing.
(3) For each property included in the list required under paragraph (2) of
this subsection, the Department shall:
(i) give notice of the determination to:
1. the unit of State government that controls the property;
and
2. the State Treasurer; and
(ii) advise the unit of State government of the requirements of
subsection (c) of this section.
(4) The list required under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be made
available to the public.
(c) (1) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection,
on receipt of the notice required under subsection (b)(3) of this section, the unit of State
government shall, in consultation with the Department and the Department of Planning,
develop a proposal to donate or sell the listed property by:
1. donating or selling the property to a nonprofit
organization that contracts to use or redevelop the property, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, as
affordable housing OR A MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT CONTAINING AFFORDABLE
HOUSING; or
2. SELLING THE PROPERTY TO A BUYER THAT
CONTRACTS TO USE OR REDEVELOP THE PROPERTY AS AFFORDABLE HOUSING; OR
3. selling the property to a buyer that contracts to use or
redevelop the property as [affordable] housing OR A MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT
CONTAINING HOUSING.
(ii) 1. If, after reasonable effort, the unit is unable to identify a
suitable nonprofit organization or buyer in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH,
the unit shall develop a proposal to sell the property at auction.

HOUSE BILL 1061
2. IF, AFTER REASONABLE EFFORT, THE UNIT IS UNABLE
TO IDENTIFY A SUITABLE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION OR BUYER IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND IF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PLANNING HAS DETERMINED THAT THE PROPERTY IS SUITABLE FOR USE FOR
SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION UNDER § 5–1002 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE UNIT SHALL DEVELOP A PROPOSAL TO FIRST
ATTEMPT TO LEASE THE PROPERTY FOR SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION AND IF THE
UNIT IS UNABLE TO LEASE THE PROPERTY, THEN SELL THE PROPERTY AT AUCTION.
(iii) A proposal developed under this paragraph shall be submitted to
the Board of Public Works for consideration in accordance with § 10–305 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The unit of State government shall consider the proposed period of
affordability, the number of affordable housing units created, and the viability of an offer
when evaluating offers from multiple nonprofit organizations or buyers under this
subsection.
(3) When a property is donated or sold in accordance with a proposal
developed under this subsection, the unit shall give notice of the disposition to the
Department.
(4) A unit may not propose to donate or sell a property under this
subsection if the donation or sale would:
(i) violate any covenant or applicable federal law; or
(ii) in the opinion of the State Treasurer, adversely affect the
tax–exempt status of an outstanding State bond, the proceeds of which were allocated to
purchase or improve the property.
(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to supersede the right of
a person from whom real property was acquired or their successor in interest to reacquire
the property under § 8–309 of the Transportation Article.
(d) On or before December 31, 2024, and each December 31 thereafter, the
Department shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article:
(1) the number of proposals submitted to the Board of Public Works under
this section;
(2) the number of properties that were donated pursuant to proposals
developed under this section; and

HOUSE BILL 1061 5
(3) the number of properties that were sold pursuant to proposals
developed under this section.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Department of Planning.
(c) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Planning.
SUBTITLE 10. STATE–OWNED REAL PROPERTY.
5–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AFFORDABLE HOUSING” MEANS RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY THAT IS
RENTED OR SOLD TO THE PUBLIC AS LOW–INCOME HOUSING OR WORKFORCE
HOUSING.
(C) “AREA MEDIAN INCOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–1801 OF THE
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(D) “LOW–INCOME HOUSING” MEANS HOUSING THAT IS AFFORDABLE FOR A
HOUSEHOLD WITH AN AGGREGATE ANNUAL INCOME THAT IS BELOW 60% OF THE
AREA MEDIAN INCOME.
(E) “WORKFORCE HOUSING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–1801 OF THE
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
5–1002.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EVERY 5 YEARS
THEREAFTER, EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL PROVIDE TO THE
DEPARTMENT AN INVENTORY OF ALL STATE–OWNED REAL PROPERTY USED BY OR
UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE UNIT.
(2) THE INVENTORY SHALL CONTAIN A DESCRIPTION OF EACH
PROPERTY AND HOW IT IS USED BY THE UNIT.

HOUSE BILL 1061
(3) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE THE SUITABILITY OF EACH PROPERTY IN THE
INVENTORY FOR USE OR REDEVELOPMENT FOR:
(I) 1. AFFORDABLE HOUSING, IN WHOLE OR IN PART; OR
2. (II) A MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT CONTAINING AFFORDABLE
HOUSING; OR
(II) SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION.
(4) PROPERTY IN THE INVENTORY MAY BE DETERMINED TO BE
SUITABLE FOR USE OR REDEVELOPMENT AS HOUSING ONLY IF THE PROPERTY IS
LOCATED IN AN AREA ZONED FOR RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED USE.
(5) WHEN DETERMINING IF A PROPERTY IS SUITABLE FOR USE OR
REDEVELOPMENT AS HOUSING, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER WHETHER THE
PROPERTY:
(I) IS ADEQUATELY SIZED FOR ANY TYPE OF RESIDENTIAL USE;
(II) HAS ACCESS TO PUBLIC UTILITIES;
(III) HAS ACCESS TO FEASIBLE INGRESS AND EGRESS POINTS;
AND
(IV) MEETS ANY OTHER FACTORS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT THAT ARE NECESSARY FOR THE PROPERTY TO BE USED OR
REDEVELOPED AS HOUSING.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONSIDER THE SUITABILITY OF
PROPERTY TO BE:
(I) LEASED FOR SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION; AND
(II) USED FOR SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION CONCURRENTLY
WITH A SEPARATE USE OF THE PROPERTY BY THE UNIT.
(7) FOR EACH PROPERTY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SPECIFY:
(I) WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS APPROPRIATE FOR ONE OF
THE USES SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1061 7
(II) WHICH USE IS APPROPRIATE FOR EACH PROPERTY ON THE
LIST, IF ANY.
(8) (7) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND EVERY 5 YEARS
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SEND THE INVENTORY TO THE GOVERNOR
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(B) (1) NOT LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER
§ 5–310(D) OF THIS TITLE, THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND THE MARYLAND
ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, SHALL IDENTIFY WHICH RELEVANT PROPERTIES IN THE
INVENTORY ARE SUITABLE FOR USE OR REDEVELOPMENT FOR HOUSING OR SOLAR
ENERGY PRODUCTION.
(2) FOR EACH PROPERTY IDENTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AS SUITABLE FOR USE OR REDEVELOPMENT FOR HOUSING OR
SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) GIVE NOTICE OF THE DETERMINATION TO:
1. THE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT THAT CONTROLS
THE PROPERTY; AND
2. THE STATE TREASURER; AND
(II) ADVISE THE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT OF THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE LIST OF PROPERTIES IDENTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AS SUITABLE FOR USE OR REDEVELOPMENT FOR HOUSING SHALL
BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC.
(C) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E)
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AND ON RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT
SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, DEVELOP A PROPOSAL TO
DONATE OR SELL THE RELEVANT PROPERTY AS FOLLOWS:
1. IF THE PROPERTY HAS BEEN DETERMINED TO BE
SUITABLE FOR HOUSING, INCLUDING AFFORDABLE HOUSING, BY:
A. 1. DONATING OR SELLING THE PROPERTY TO A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT CONTRACTS TO USE OR REDEVELOP THE

HOUSE BILL 1061
PROPERTY IN WHOLE OR IN PART FOR HOUSING, WITH A PRIORITY FOR USE AS
AFFORDABLE HOUSING; OR
B. 2. SELLING THE PROPERTY TO A BUYER THAT
CONTRACTS TO USE OR REDEVELOP THE PROPERTY IN WHOLE OR IN PART AS
HOUSING, WITH A PRIORITY FOR USE AS AFFORDABLE HOUSING; OR
2. IF THE PROPERTY HAS BEEN DETERMINED TO BE
SUITABLE FOR SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION, BY SELLING THE PROPERTY TO A
PERSON THAT CONTRACTS TO USE OR REDEVELOP THE PROPERTY FOR SOLAR
ENERGY PRODUCTION.
(II) IF THE PROPERTY HAS BEEN DETERMINED TO BE SUITABLE
FOR MORE THAN ONE USE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
PROPERTY SHALL BE OFFERED FOR DONATION OR SALE FOR A USE LISTED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN THE ORDER THAT THE USES ARE LISTED.
(III) IF, AFTER REASONABLE EFFORT, THE UNIT IS UNABLE TO
IDENTIFY A SUITABLE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION OR BUYER IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE UNIT SHALL DEVELOP A PROPOSAL
TO SELL THE PROPERTY AT AUCTION.
(IV) A PROPOSAL DEVELOPED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL
BE SUBMITTED TO THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS FOR CONSIDERATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–305 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) IF THE PROPERTY SHALL BE USED OR REDEVELOPED, IN WHOLE
OR IN PART, FOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING, THE UNIT SHALL CONSIDER THE
PROPOSED PERIOD OF AFFORDABILITY, THE NUMBER OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING
UNITS CREATED, AND THE VIABILITY OF AN OFFER WHEN EVALUATING OFFERS
FROM MULTIPLE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS OR BUYERS UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(I)1A (1)(I)1 OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) WHEN A PROPERTY IS DONATED OR SOLD IN ACCORDANCE WITH
A PROPOSAL DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE UNIT SHALL GIVE NOTICE
OF THE DISPOSITION TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) IF THE DEPARTMENT HAS DETERMINED THAT A PROPERTY IS NOT
SUITABLE FOR USE AS HOUSING BUT IS SUITABLE FOR USE FOR SOLAR ENERGY
PRODUCTION, THE UNIT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, MAY
CONSIDER:
(1) LEASING THE PROPERTY FOR SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION; OR

HOUSE BILL 1061 9
(2) USING THE PROPERTY FOR SOLAR ENERGY PRODUCTION
CONCURRENTLY WITH A SEPARATE USE OF THE PROPERTY BY THE UNIT.
(E) (1) A UNIT MAY NOT PROPOSE TO DONATE OR SELL A PROPERTY
UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE DONATION OR SALE WOULD:
(I) VIOLATE ANY COVENANT OR APPLICABLE FEDERAL LAW; OR
(II) IN THE OPINION OF THE STATE TREASURER, ADVERSELY
AFFECT THE TAX–EXEMPT STATUS OF AN OUTSTANDING STATE BOND, THE
PROCEEDS OF WHICH WERE ALLOCATED TO PURCHASE OR IMPROVE THE
PROPERTY.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO SUPERSEDE
THE RIGHT OF A PERSON FROM WHOM REAL PROPERTY WAS ACQUIRED OR THE
PERSON’S SUCCESSOR IN INTEREST TO REACQUIRE THE PROPERTY UNDER § 8–309
OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(F) (E) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE:
(1) THE NUMBER OF PROPOSALS SUBMITTED TO THE BOARD OF
PUBLIC WORKS UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) THE NUMBER OF PROPERTIES THAT WERE DONATED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PROPOSALS DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(3) THE NUMBER OF PROPERTIES THAT WERE SOLD IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PROPOSALS DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(4) THE NUMBER OF PROPERTIES LEASED OR USED CONCURRENTLY
WITH A UNIT UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 31,
2030:
(1) at least 10,000 housing units shall be constructed on land that was
owned by the State on the effective date of this Act; and
(2) at least 55 megawatts of solar energy shall be produced on land that
was owned by the State on the effective date of this Act.

HOUSE BILL 1061
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 31,
2030, the Department of Housing and Community Development shall set goals for the
construction of housing units on land that was owned by the State on the effective date of
this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.